Arkansas statutes. Title 13 Libraries, Archives, and Cultural Resources
Chapter 7

Historic Preservation

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this subchapter” in §§13-7-101 to13-7-109 may not apply to §13-7-110 which was enacted subsequently.

Acts 2015, No. 407, § 2, provided: “As referenced in SECTION 3, subsection (c) of Acts 1202 and 1753 of 2007, the authorized funding for the Arkansas Cemetery Board for cemetery maintenance, operations and acquisition costs, and as amended by SECTIONS 1 and 2 of Act 427 of 2009 to also be deemed to include grants to be made to non-profit/government entity owners of perpetual care cemeteries of historic nature, shall also be deemed to include grants to be made to non-profit entities for the care and improvement of perpetual care cemeteries of historic nature.”

Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 1, provided:

“(a)

The General Assembly finds:

“(1)

State government provides vital functions that impact the lives of Arkansas citizens on a daily basis;

“(2)

While these functions are important, it is equally important to ensure that state government operates efficiently and effectively to eliminate unnecessary spending of tax dollars and provide timely and quality services to Arkansas citizens; and

“(3)

Issues such as the administrative organization of a governmental entity, the appointment structure of a governmental entity's governing board, and extraneous duties assigned to governmental entities hamper the operation of state government and result in unnecessary expenses and delays in the provision of state services.

“(b)

It is the intent of this act to amend provisions of law applicable to certain agencies, task forces, committees, and commission to promote efficiency and effectiveness in the operations of state government as a whole.”

Preambles.

Acts 1977, No. 480 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, the historical and cultural heritage of Arkansas should be preserved as a living part of our community life, economic development, and social well-being in order to give a sense of orientation to all the citizens of Arkansas; and

“Whereas, the spirit and direction of the future of Arkansas are founded upon and reflected in its unique and historic past; and

“Now therefore….”

Effective Dates.

Acts 1977, No. 480, § 14: Mar. 17, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that it is desirable that the historical and cultural heritage of the State of Arkansas be preserved; that it is essential that an agency be created to coordinate and supervise authority in preserving the historical and cultural heritage of the state; that this act is designed to accomplish this purpose and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 663, § 3: Mar. 22, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that there is an immediate need to expand the powers and duties of the Arkansas Historic Preservation Program to enter into contracts, to receive and expend funds obtained from any source, and to charge fees; and this act is immediately necessary to grant such authority. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governer, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 128: July 1, 2016.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

13-7-101. Public policy.

(a)

The General Assembly determines that the historical, archeological, architectural, and cultural heritage of Arkansas is among the most important economic and environmental assets of this state and that rapid development threatens to remove the remaining vestiges of Arkansas’s proud and unique heritage.

(b)

Therefore, it is declared to be public policy and in the best interests of the general economic, social, and educational welfare of all the citizens of Arkansas for this state to engage in a comprehensive program of historic preservation, undertaken at all levels of the government of Arkansas and its political subdivisions, to promote the use and preservation of property for the public interest and the education, inspiration, pleasure, and enrichment of the citizens of this state.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 480, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 8-904.

13-7-102. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

(1)

“Historic preservation” means the research, interpretation, presentation, protection, restoration, and rehabilitation of historic property; and

(2)

“Historic property” means any building, structure, object, district, area, or site that is significant in the history, architecture, archeology, or culture of this state, its communities, or the nation.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 480, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 8-905.

13-7-103. Construction.

Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to repeal or diminish any of the powers, functions, or responsibilities of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism, the State Parks, Recreation, and Travel Commission, the Old State House Commission, and the Arkansas Archeological Survey, as prescribed by law.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 480, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 8-913; Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 118; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 118; 2019, No. 910, § 5597.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 1971, No. 38, § 7 transferred the State Parks, Recreation, and Travel Commission by type 4 transfer to the Department of Parks and Tourism.

Amendments.

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3 substituted “Department of Arkansas Heritage” for “Arkansas History Commission”.

The 2019 amendment substituted “responsibilities of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “responsibilities of the Department of Arkansas Heritage”.

13-7-104. Administration of program.

The Division of Arkansas Heritage is designated as the agency of this state to develop and implement a statewide program of historic preservation.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 480, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 8-906; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5598.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism, Division of Arkansas Heritage” for “Department of Arkansas Heritage”.

13-7-105. Arkansas Archeological Survey to perform archeological functions.

(a)

All archeological functions of the program of historic preservation, including that under 54 U.S.C. § 302301 et seq. and as provided for under this subchapter shall be performed by the Arkansas Archeological Survey for the purpose of statewide archeological investigation and preservation.

(b)

In furtherance of the development and implementation of a statewide program of historic preservation, the survey and the Arkansas Historic Preservation Program of the Division of Arkansas Heritage shall cooperate in the fullest manner possible.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 480, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 8-908; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5599.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas Heritage” for “Department of Arkansas Heritage” in (b).

Cross References.

Arkansas Historic Preservation Program of the Department of Arkansas Heritage, §25-3-102.

13-7-106. Arkansas Historic Preservation Program — Powers and duties.

(a)

The Arkansas Historic Preservation Program, a division of the Division of Arkansas Heritage, under the State Historic Preservation Officer, shall have the following powers and duties:

(1)

To implement the development of a State Historic Preservation Plan as contemplated by 54 U.S.C. § 302301 et seq., but not necessarily restricted thereto, and to be responsible for the historical, architectural, and cultural portions of that plan;

(2)

To conduct surveys and otherwise develop the data necessary for the historical, architectural, and cultural portions of the plan;

(3)

To cooperate with the Arkansas Archeological Survey which will be responsible for the archeological portion of the statewide program for historic preservation and the plan as provided for in §13-7-105;

(4)

To coordinate the surveys and other programs of activities of all state and private agencies in connection with projects supported by federal funds provided to the Division of Arkansas Heritage to implement 54 U.S.C. § 302301 et seq. and all cash funds or appropriated state funds made available to the division for the program;

(5)

To allocate any federal funds which are provided to implement 54 U.S.C. § 302301 et seq. to those state agencies or private or other organizations which are professionally staffed and capable of carrying out the programs provided for by 54 U.S.C. § 302301 et seq.;

(6)

To accept and administer funds received from the state or federal government or any other governmental agencies or from any private source in furtherance of the provisions of this subchapter; provided, that administration and acceptance does not include cash or appropriated funds made available to the Arkansas Archeological Survey from whatever source;

(7)

To reimburse members of committees appointed by the Governor for expenses in accordance with §25-16-901 et seq.;

(8)

To enlist the cooperation and assistance of the Old State House Commission, the Arkansas State Archives, the State Parks, Recreation, and Travel Commission, and all other agencies for historical, architectural, and cultural purposes, to the end that all activities shall be developed in accordance with the plan as contemplated by this subchapter and 54 U.S.C. § 302301 et seq., and in accordance with existing state laws pertaining to the duties and responsibilities of each of the agencies indicated in this subdivision (a)(8);

(9)

To cooperate with federal, state, and local government agencies in surveying the state for historic properties to be included in the State Register of Historic Places or National Register of Historic Places, or both, in the planning and conduct of specific undertakings affecting historic properties and preservation objectives, and, generally, in overall planning for the use of land; and

(10)

To perform all other functions necessary in the furtherance of the purpose of this subchapter and in coordinating and implementing the participation by this state in the purposes contemplated by 54 U.S.C. § 302301 et seq.

(b)(1)

The program is authorized to:

(A)

Enter into contracts;

(B)

Receive and expend gifts, grants, or other funds from federal or private sources; and

(C)

Charge fees for conferences, tax certification, easements, and the professional review of federal undertakings for their impact on cultural resources.

(2)

These funds shall be deposited in the cash fund of the program.

(c)(1)

The program is authorized to acquire in the name of the state sites, buildings, and objects of historical value by gift, purchase, or otherwise.

(2)

No property shall be acquired or contract or agreement for the acquisition thereof made which will obligate the state for the payment of the property, or the maintenance or improvement thereof after acquisition, in the absence of the appropriation of funds by the General Assembly for that purpose.

(3)

The interest in any land authorized to be acquired by this subchapter may be fee simple or any lesser interest as determined by the State Historic Preservation Officer with the advice of the State Review Committee for Historic Preservation to be reasonably necessary to accomplish the purpose of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 480, § 8; 1983, No. 663, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 8-911; Acts 1997, No. 250, § 81; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 119; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 119; 2019, No. 910, § 5600.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 1971, No. 38, § 7 transferred the State Parks, Recreation, and Travel Commission by type 4 transfer to the Department of Parks and Tourism.

Amendments.

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3 substituted “State Archives” for “History Commission” in (a)(9).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas Heritage” for “Department of Arkansas Heritage” in the introductory language of (a); in (a)(4), substituted “Division of Arkansas Heritage” for the first occurrence of “department” and substituted “division” for the second occurrence of “department”; deleted (a)(6) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; and substituted “(a)(8)” for “(a)(9)” in (a)(8).

13-7-107. State Historic Preservation Officer — Appointment and duties.

(a)

The Governor shall designate the State Historic Preservation Officer who shall be an employee of the Division of Arkansas Heritage.

(b)

The State Historic Preservation Officer shall be responsible for conducting relations with the representatives of the federal government, the respective states, governmental units within Arkansas, state agencies, organizations, and individuals with regard to matters of historic preservation.

(c)

The State Historic Preservation Officer is charged with the responsibility for the professional and fiscal conduct of the Arkansas Historic Preservation Program, including the program carried out under 54 U.S.C. § 302301 et seq.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 480, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 8-907; 2019, No. 910, §
5601.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas Heritage” for “Department of Arkansas Heritage” in (a).

13-7-108. Review committee — Powers and duties.

(a)

There is recognized the existence of the State Review Committee for Historic Preservation established in accordance with federal guidelines promulgated under 54 U.S.C. § 302301 et seq.

(b)

The committee shall be appointed by the Governor with a minimum of five (5) members.

(c)

The committee shall have the power and duty to:

(1)

Review districts, sites, buildings, structures, and objects which may be recommended for inclusion in a State Register of Historic Places or National Register of Historic Places, or both, and advise the State Historic Preservation Officer concerning their nomination;

(2)

Review and advise the State Historic Preservation Officer on the State Historic Preservation Plan;

(3)

Elect a chair and spell out rules and procedures as necessary; and

(4)

Act in an advisory capacity to the State Historic Preservation Officer.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 480, §§ 6, 7; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 8-909, 8-910.

13-7-109. State Register of Historic Places.

(a)

There is created a State Register of Historic Places.

(b)(1)(A)

The State Historic Preservation Officer, in consultation with the State Review Committee for Historic Preservation, shall establish a listing of sites, districts, structures, buildings, areas, or objects above or below the surface of the earth, whether on land or in the waters of the state, together with any designated improvements thereon, significant in the history, architecture, archeology, or culture of the state, its communities, or the nation.

(B)

The listing shall constitute the State Register of Historic Places.

(2)

All historic places within the state listed on or nominated to the National Register of Historic Places shall be deemed to be listed in the State Register of Historic Places.

(c)

The State Historic Preservation Officer, with the advice of the review committee, shall establish the procedures and the criteria for listing in the State Register of Historic Places.

(d)

Listing a privately owned property in the State Register of Historic Places shall in no way violate or abridge the lawful owner's right to use, modify, or dispose of the property.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 155, § 1.

13-7-110. Arkansas Historic Building Code authorized.

(a)

The Arkansas Historic Preservation Program may by rule promulgated pursuant to the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, §25-15-201 et seq., adopt an Arkansas Historic Building Code for buildings listed individually on the National Register of Historic Places, buildings eligible for listing individually on the National Register of Historic Places, and buildings listed as a contributing resource in a National Register Historic District.

(b)

To the extent that the provisions of the Arkansas Historic Building Code adopted by the program conflict with any state or local building or fire code, the Arkansas Historic Building Code shall prevail as to the buildings described in subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 935, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 982.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this subchapter” in §§13-7-101—13-7-109 may not apply to this section which was enacted subsequently.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (a).

Cross References.

Cities and towns, Historic Districts Act, §14-172-201 et seq.

13-7-111. Signage for war relocation centers.

(a)

The General Assembly finds that:

(1)

There are only two (2) war relocation centers for people of Japanese descent that were operated by the War Relocation Authority during World War II in Arkansas: Jerome and Rohwer;

(2)

Rohwer is recognized as a National Historic Landmark for its importance in American history and importance to Japanese Americans and is an important part of Arkansas's history; and

(3)

Jerome is an equally valuable part of the history of Arkansas and the history of many Japanese Americans.

(b)(1)

The Division of Arkansas Heritage shall erect signs to inform visitors about the historic landmarks of Jerome and Rohwer in Southeast Arkansas, subject to the appropriation and availability of funding.

(2)

Any signs placed in a right-of-way of a state highway shall be approved by the State Highway Commission.

(c)

The signs shall include the following about Jerome and Rohwer:

(1)

Information about the size and locations;

(2)

Site plans;

(3)

Photographs;

(4)

Dates of occupancy; and

(5)

Other information as determined by the Division of Arkansas Heritage that would be of value to visitors of Jerome and Rohwer.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 1153, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §§
5602, 5603.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas Heritage” for “Department of Arkansas Heritage” in (b)(1) and (c)(5).

Preambles.

Acts 2007, No. 1153, contained a preamble which read: “WHEREAS, on February 19, 1942, seventy-four (74) days after the Japanese attack on Pearl Harbor, President Franklin D. Roosevelt signed Executive Order 9066, which established military exclusion zones and enabled the federal government to force more than one hundred ten thousand (110,000) people of Japanese descent to sell all of their belongings, evacuate their homes with only what they could carry, and enter confinement at assembly centers; and

“WHEREAS, seventy percent (70%) of the people who were forced into assembly centers were American citizens of Japanese descent; and

“WHEREAS, while first confined in assembly centers, the people of Japanese descent were then moved by train to war relocation centers which were established by the War Relocation Authority (WRA); and

WHEREAS, most of the WRA centers were in California, Arizona, Idaho, Utah, and Colorado, but in the summer of 1942, two (2) war relocation centers emerged from the swamps and forests of southeast Arkansas, Jerome and Rohwer; and

“WHEREAS, Jerome and Rohwer were selected by the federal government for their geographic isolation and location near railroad tracks in southeast Arkansas; and

“WHEREAS, Jerome and Rohwer were the only WRA centers east of the Rocky Mountains and the WRA centers that were farthest east; and

“WHEREAS, Jerome and Rohwer housed approximately seventeen thousand (17,000) Japanese American inmates; and

‘WHEREAS, Jerome opened on October 6, 1942, and closed on June 30, 1944, at its peak population housed eight thousand four hundred ninety-seven (8,497) inmates, and has the distinction of being the last WRA center to open and the first one to close; and

“WHEREAS, Rohwer opened on September 18, 1942, and closed on November 30, 1945, and inmates assigned to Rohwer came from Hawaii; Los Angeles County, California; and San Joaquin County, California; and

“WHEREAS, Rohwer at its peak population housed eight thousand four hundred seventy-five (8,475) inmates; and

“WHEREAS, after the war, most of the physical traces of the WRA centers’ existence disappeared, and now oats, soybeans, winter wheat, and cotton grow where the Jerome Relocation Center and Rohwer Relocation Center once stood; and

“WHEREAS, the evidence of Jerome’s existence that remains today and that is visible from U.S. Highway 165 is a smokestack from the hospital complex, two concrete tanks from the wastewater disposal plant, and a former administration building that is visible from U.S. Highway 165; and

“WHEREAS, the evidence of Rohwer’s existence that remains today is a cemetery with two (2) cement monuments and twenty-four (24) graves placed in a formal landscape that the inmates designed and created; and

“WHEREAS, in 1992, Rohwer was recognized as a National Historic Landmark and opposite the cemetery sits two (2) contemporary granite monuments, one (1) that acknowledges the status as a National Historic Landmark and the other that acknowledges former inmate Sam Yada’s dedication to educating future generations about the Japanese American experience in World War II in Arkansas; and

“WHEREAS, hundreds if not thousands of Japanese American visitors make a pilgrimage to southeast Arkansas each year to see where their ancestors lived and where their grandparents were born; and

“WHEREAS, Rohwer and Jerome are areas of substantial historic interest to all Arkansans and contribute to the state’s overall economy by serving as recognized national tourist attractions to out-of-state visitors,

“NOW THEREFORE,”

Subchapter 2

— Old State House Commission

Effective Dates.

Acts 1947, No. 256, § 5: approved Mar. 19, 1947. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and declared by the General Assembly that the historic sites, buildings and objects which are now marked for preservation by the state are subject to disintegration and casualty, with resulting irreparable loss, which can best be avoided through a commission having comprehensive and uniform jurisdiction, and that other historic sites, buildings and objects which are or may become worthy of preservation cannot be reasonably acquired for the purpose because of the absence of a commission charged with the duty of ascertaining their exceptional value; hence, this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governer, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 717, § 2: July 1, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that under §25-15-105, the authority of the Old State House Commission to charge certain fees currently collected by the commission will expire on July 1, 2013, and that this act is necessary to allow the commission to continue to collect the revenues it currently receives and to allow the commission to maintain its current level of operation. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2013.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

13-7-201. Old State House Commission — Purpose and creation.

There is created and established at the seat of government the Old State House Commission for the purposes of:

(1)

Providing comprehensive and uniform jurisdiction over the sites, buildings, and objects, past and prospective, which will illustrate for all time the struggles and triumphs, the self-respectand pride, of the progenitors of Arkansas, and also of the present and succeeding generations when they shall themselves have become parts of its history;

(2)

Determining from time to time which of these sites, buildings, and objects in addition to those already made available to public enjoyment possesses exceptional commemorative value;

(3)

Protecting these sites, buildings, and objects against deterioration and casualty; and

(4)

Improving, beautifying, preserving, and rendering these sites convenient for appropriate use and public inspection.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 256, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 8-201.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2001, No. 68, § 1, provided:

“(a)

The Arkansas Commemorative Commission shall hereafter be known as the ‘Old State House Commission’.

“(b)

The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make appropriate changes to sections of the Arkansas Code to substitute the ‘Old State House Commission’ for the ‘Arkansas Commemorative Commission’.

“(c)

This section is not required to be codified by the Arkansas Code Revision Commission.”

Publisher's Notes.

The Arkansas Commemorative Commission and its functions, powers, and duties were transferred to the Department of Parks and Tourism by a type 1 transfer pursuant to Acts 1971, No. 38, § 7. Subsequently, the Arkansas Commemorative Commission and its functions, powers, and duties were transferred by a type 1 transfer to the Department of Arkansas Heritage pursuant to Acts 1975, No. 1001, § 4.

13-7-202. Members — Appointment — Terms — Vacancies.

(a)

The Old State House Commission shall consist of nine (9) members. The commissioners shall be citizens of Arkansas, selected because of their knowledge of and interest in Arkansas history.

(b)

The commission members shall be appointed by the Governor, with two (2) members from the state at large, and one (1) member from each congressional district as now or hereafter created.

(c)

Upon his or her appointment, each member shall notify the Governor in writing of his or her acceptance thereof or the appointment shall be void, and the Governor shall again appoint, unless the appointee shall thus indicate acceptance within fifteen (15) days.

(d)

The term of office of each member appointed shall begin with the expiration of the term of his or her predecessor in office and shall each expire nine (9) years thereafter. Each member appointed shall continue to hold his or her office after the expiration of the term thereof until his or her successor shall have qualified.

(e)

Any vacancy arising in the membership otherwise than by the expiration of the term of office shall be filled by appointment by the Governor for the balance of the term of the membership which became vacant and until the qualification of a successor in regular course.

(f)

The Governor may, upon notice and hearing, remove any member for misconduct, neglect of duty, or other sufficient cause.

(g)

The members shall receive no compensation for their services, but they may receive expense reimbursement in accordance with §25-16-901 et seq.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 256, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 8-201, 8-202; Acts 1997, No. 250, § 82.

Publisher's Notes.

The terms of the members of the Arkansas Commemorative Commission are arranged so that one term expires every year.

Cross References.

Effect of reduction of congressional districts on state boards and commissions, §25-16-801.

13-7-203. Officers — Rules — Meetings — Reports.

(a)

The Governor shall designate one (1) of the members of the Old State House Commission to serve as its chair until the expiration of his or her term or at the pleasure of the Governor.

(b)

The commission shall select from its membership from time to time a vice chair and a secretary.

(c)

The commission shall adopt and may modify rules for the conduct of business and shall keep a record of its transactions, findings, and determinations, which record shall be public.

(d)

The rules shall provide for regular meetings and for special meetings at the call of the chair, or of the vice chair if he or she is for any reason the acting chair, either at his or her own instance or upon the written request of at least five (5) members.

(e)

A quorum of the commission shall consist of not fewer than five (5) members present at any regular or special meeting, and a majority affirmative vote of the members so present shall be sufficient for the disposition of any business.

(f)

By the first Monday in September of each year, it shall be the duty of the commission to cause to be prepared and presented to the Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism a report showing the operation of the commission during the previous fiscal year and containing recommendations.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 256, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 8-203; Acts 1951, No. 385, § 1; 2009, No. 558, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §§
5604, 5605.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment, in (f), inserted “By the first Monday in September of each year,” substituted “during the previous fiscal year” for “since the date of its last previous report,” deleted the last sentence, which read: “This shall be done annually not later than the first Monday in December,” and made related changes.

The 2019 amendment deleted the second sentence in (b); and substituted “Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “Governor” in (f).

13-7-204. Oaths — Penalty for violation — Effect of conviction.

(a)

Each member of the Old State House Commission shall, before entering upon his or her duties, file in the office of the Secretary of State, the oath provided by Arkansas Constitution, Article 19, § 20, and in addition that he or she will not be a party, directly or indirectly, to any action taken by the commission that may in any manner affect his or her private interests.

(b)

The violation of the oath shall constitute a misdemeanor punishable by fine in any amount not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) or by imprisonment not exceeding one (1) year, or by both fine and imprisonment.

(c)

Conviction shall bar a person from continued membership and shall void any action of the commission in which he or she participated.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 256, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 8-202.

13-7-205. Powers and duties.

The Old State House Commission shall:

(1)

Take over all records, files, books, and papers in the custody or control of persons with custody or control of sites, buildings, and objects which are marked for preservation for historical purposes in charge of the commission;

(2)

Secure, collate, and preserve drawings, plans, photographs, and other data of historic sites, buildings, and objects;

(3)

Make surveys of historic sites, buildings, and objects for the purpose of determining which possess value as illustrative of the history of the state;

(4)

Make diligent researches to obtain accurate historical facts and information relating to sites, buildings, and objects;

(5)(A)

Acquire in the name of the state sites, buildings, and objects of historical value by gift, purchase, or otherwise.

(B)

However, no such property shall be acquired, or contract or agreement for the acquisition thereof made, which will obligate the state for the payment of the property, or the maintenance or improvement thereof after acquisition, in the absence of the appropriation of funds by the General Assembly for the purpose;

(6)

Restore, reconstruct, rehabilitate, preserve and maintain historic sites, buildings and objects, and the grounds and the approaches thereto;

(7)

Operate and manage historic sites, buildings, and objects for the benefit of the public, which authority shall include the power to charge reasonable visitation and rental fees and grant permits for the use of land or building space when necessary or desirable to accommodate the public, or to facilitate administration, or for other appropriate purposes;

(8)

Develop an educational program and service for the purpose of making available to the public facts and information pertaining to Arkansas historic sites, buildings, and objects and make reasonable charges for the dissemination of the facts or information;

(9)(A)

Perform any and all acts, and make and publicly post such rules not inconsistent with law as may be necessary and proper to carry out the provisions of this subchapter.

(B)

The purpose of the rules shall be to carry into effect the commission's implied powers, to be ascertained from the express provisions of this subchapter.

(C)

The rules shall be deposited with the Secretary of State and that official's receipt taken.

(D)

Any person violating any of these rules shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by fine in any amount not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) or by imprisonment not exceeding one (1) year, or by both fine and imprisonment; and

(10)

Receive administrative support and be provided all employees necessary to carry out the duties of the commission from the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 256, § 4; 1963, No. 208, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 8-204; Acts 2013, No. 717, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §
5606.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment inserted “and rental” preceding “fees” in (7).

The 2019 amendment added (10).

13-7-206. Old State House.

(a)(1)

The Old State Capitol building and grounds, situated on West Markham Street between Ashley and Conway Streets, in the City of Little Rock, Pulaski County, Arkansas, shall be known and designated as the Old State House.

(2)

Title to the property shall remain in the State of Arkansas.

(b)

The Old State House Commission shall have exclusive jurisdiction for the custody, care, restoration, and use of the Old State House, at all times preserving its architectural design.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 256, § 4; 1963, No. 208, § 1; 1979, No. 614, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 8-204.